District of Columbia statutes.
47-2110

Preservation of authority; delegation of functions.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed so as to affect the authority vested in the Commissioners by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952 (66 Stat. 824). The performance of any function vested by this chapter in the Commissioners of the District of Columbia or in any office or agency under the jurisdiction and control of the said Commissioners may be delegated by said Commissioners in accordance with § 3 of such Plan.

History

Sept. 1, 1959, 73 Stat. 451, Pub. L. 86-219, § 11
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Cross References

Mayor, powers and duties, see § 1-204.22.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2110.
1973 Ed., § 47-3010.